Wyoming, session 2025, SF0032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-5-303(b) and by creating a new
subsection (f) is amended to read:
31-5-303. Establishing maximum speed limits by local
authorities.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this
section, in compliance with rules promulgated by the
department, local authorities in their respective
jurisdictions may determine the proper maximum speed for
all streets and highways within their respective corporate
jurisdiction which maximum speed is reasonable and safe and
which may be greater or less than the maximum speed
permitted under this act. The rules promulgated by the
department shall adopt standards consistent with national
practices. The department shall not promulgate rules that
require a speed study before a local authority establishes
a maximum speed limit for unpaved roads in accordance with
subsection (f) of this section.
(f) A local authority may decrease a maximum speed
limit to not less than thirty-five (35) miles per hour for
unpaved roadways under W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv) without first
conducting a speed study. A local authority may establish a
temporary speed limit of less than thirty-five (35) miles
per hour without conducting a speed study and for a period
not exceeding one (1) year for purposes including, but not
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 81, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
limited to, construction, maintenance, special events,
emergency situations and changes in use. Before
establishing a temporary speed limit of less than thirty-
five (35) miles per hour, the local authority shall consult
with the local authority's engineer or road and bridge
superintendent and law enforcement with jurisdiction over
the roadway.
Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate any rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 81, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3